Massachusetts, session 194th, H3897.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 40 and Chapter 30B of the
General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, the City of Quincy is hereby
authorized to extend the lease of a certain parcel of land comprised of approximately 241.78
acres of land, together with any improvements thereon, located in Quincy, Norfolk County,
Massachusetts known as the former municipal sanitary landfill and adjacent parcels thereto, as
authorized by Chapter 50 of the Acts of 1994, to Quarry Hills Associates, Limited Partnership
for a period of up to fifty years.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1